Utah statutes.
49-20-403.   Assistance to members in purchase of life, health, dental, and
medical insurance after retirement -- Employment of personnel to administer
section.
(1)  The program may assist active and retired covered individuals and
inactive covered individuals of the covered employers to purchase life,
health, dental, and medical coverage on a group basis which can be continued
after retirement under rules adopted by the board.
(2)  The executive director may employ any personnel, including consultants,
to administer this section.
